Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 7 Assisted Outpatient Treatment

Effective date.

This article became effective July 1, 2022.

37-1-120.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Addictive disease” has the same meaning as in Code Section 37-1-1.

“Assisted outpatient treatment” means involuntary outpatient care, pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 3 of this title, provided in the context of a formalized, systematic effort led by a community service board or private provider in collaboration with
other community partners, endeavoring to:

Identify residents of the community service board’s or private provider’s service area who qualify as outpatients pursuant to Code Section 37-3-1;

Establish procedures such that upon the identification of an individual believed to be an outpatient, a petition seeking involuntary outpatient care for the individual is filed in the probate court of the appropriate county;

Provide evidence based treatment, rehabilitation, and case management services under an individualized service plan to each patient receiving involuntary outpatient care, focused on helping the patient maintain stability and safety in the community;

Safeguard, at all stages of proceedings, the due process rights of respondents alleged to require involuntary outpatient care and patients who have been ordered to undergo involuntary outpatient care;

Establish routine communications between the probate court and providers of treatment and case management such that for each patient receiving involuntary outpatient care, the court receives the clinical information it needs to exercise its authority
appropriately and providers can leverage all available resources in motivating the patient to engage with treatment;

Continually evaluate the appropriateness of each patient’s individualized service plan throughout the period of involuntary outpatient care, and adjust the plan as warranted;

Employ specific protocols to respond appropriately and lawfully in the event of a failure of or noncompliance with involuntary outpatient care;

Partner with law enforcement agencies to provide an alternative to arrest, incarceration, and prosecution for individuals suspected or accused of criminal conduct who appear to qualify as outpatients pursuant to Code Section 37-3-1;

Clinically evaluate each patient receiving involuntary outpatient care at the end of the treatment period to determine whether it is appropriate to seek an additional period of involuntary outpatient care or assist the patient in transitioning to voluntary
care; and

Ensure that upon transitioning to voluntary outpatient care at an appropriate juncture, each patient remains connected to the treatment services he or she continues to need to maintain stability and safety in the community.

“Mental health or substance use disorder” means a mental illness or addictive disease.

“Mental illness” has the same meaning as in Code Section 37-1-1.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-1/HB 1013.

37-1-121.
Grant program for implementation of assisted outpatient treatment.

The department shall establish and operate a grant program for the purpose of fostering the implementation and practice of assisted outpatient treatment in this state. The grant program shall aim to provide three years of funding, technical support, and
oversight to five grantees, each comprising a collaboration between a community service board or private provider, a probate court or courts with jurisdiction in the corresponding service area, and a sheriff’s office or offices with
jurisdiction in the corresponding service area, which have demonstrated the ability with grant assistance to practice assisted outpatient treatment. Subject to appropriations, the funding, technical support, and oversight pursuant
to the grant program shall commence no later than January 1, 2023, and shall terminate on December 31, 2025, or subject to the department’s annual review of each grantee, whichever event shall first occur.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-1/HB 1013.

37-1-122.
Funding opportunity announcement; requirements; assistance; announcement of awards.

No later than October 1, 2022, the department shall issue a funding opportunity announcement inviting any community service board or private provider, in partnership with a court or courts holding jurisdiction over probate matters in the corresponding
service area, to submit a written application for funding pursuant to the assisted outpatient treatment grant program.

The department shall develop and disclose in the funding opportunity announcement:

A numerical scoring rubric to evaluate applications, which shall include a minimum score an application must receive to be potentially eligible for funding;

A formula for determining the amount of funding for which a grantee shall be eligible, based on the size of the population to be served, consideration of existing resources, or both;

A minimum percentage of a grant award that must be directed, and a maximum percentage of a grant award that may be directed, for purposes of enhancing the community based mental health services and supports provided to recipients of assisted outpatient
treatment; and

A minimum percentage of the total program budget that must be independently sourced by the applicant.

The funding opportunity announcement shall require each application to include, in addition to any other information the department may choose to require:

A detailed three-year program budget, including identification of the source or sources of the applicant’s independent budget contribution;

A plan to identify and serve a population composed of persons meeting the following criteria, including the number of patients anticipated to participate in the program over the course of each year of grant support:

The person is 18 years of age or older;

The person is suffering from a mental health or substance use disorder which has been clinically documented by a health care provider licensed to practice in Georgia;

There has been a clinical determination by a physician or psychologist that the person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision;

The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her mental health or substance use disorder, in that at least one of the following is true:

The person’s mental health or substance use disorder has, at least twice within the previous 36 months, been a substantial factor in necessitating hospitalization or the receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a correctional facility,
not including any period during which such person was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition; or

The person’s mental health or substance use disorder has resulted in one or more acts of serious and violent behavior toward himself or herself or others or threatens or attempts to cause serious physical injury to himself or herself or others within
the preceding 48 months, not including any period in which such person was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition;

It is likely that the person may benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

The person has been offered an opportunity to participate in a treatment plan by the department, a state mental health facility, a community service board, or a private provider under contract with the department and such person continues to fail to engage
in treatment;

The person’s condition is substantially deteriorating;

Participation in the assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive placement necessary to ensure such person’s recovery and stability;

In view of the person’s treatment history and current behavior, such person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would likely result in grave disability or serious harm to himself or herself or
others; and

For each element of assisted outpatient treatment, a statement of how the applicant proposes to incorporate such element into its own practice of assisted outpatient treatment;

A commitment by the applicant that it shall honor the provisions of any legally enforceable psychiatric advance directive of any person receiving involuntary outpatient treatment;

A description of the evidence based treatment services and case management model or models that the applicant proposes to utilize;

A description of any dedicated staff positions the applicant proposes to establish;

A letter of support from the sheriff of any county where the applicant proposes to provide assisted outpatient treatment;

A flowchart representing the proposed assisted outpatient treatment process, from initial case referral to transition to voluntary care; and

A description of the applicant’s plans to establish a stakeholder workgroup, consisting of representatives of each of the agencies, entities, and communities deemed essential to the functioning of the assisted outpatient treatment program, for purposes
of internal oversight and program improvement.

The department shall not provide direct assistance or direct guidance to any potential applicant in developing the content of an application. Any questions directed to the department from potential applicants concerning the grant application process or
interpretation of the funding opportunity announcement may only be entertained at a live webinar announced in advance in the funding opportunity announcement and open to all potential applicants, or may be submitted in writing
and answered on a webpage disclosed in the funding opportunity announcement and freely accessible to any potential applicant.

No later than December 31, 2022, the department shall publicly announce awards for funding support, subject to annual review, to the five applicants whose applications received the highest scores under the scoring rubric, provided that:

The department shall seek to ensure, to the extent practical and consistent with other objectives, that at least three of the regions designated pursuant to Code Section 37-2-3 are represented among the five grantees. In pursuit of this goal, the department
may in its discretion award a grant to a lower-scoring applicant over a higher-scoring applicant or may resolve a tie score in favor of an applicant that would increase regional diversity among the grantees; and

In no case shall a grant be awarded to an applicant whose application has failed to attain the minimum required score as stated in the funding opportunity announcement. This requirement shall take precedence in the event that it comes into conflict with
the requirement that a total of five grants be awarded.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-1/HB 1013.

37-1-123.
Technical assistance providers.

Throughout the term of the assisted outpatient treatment grant program, the department shall contract on an annual basis with an organization, entity, or consultant possessing expertise in the practice of assisted outpatient treatment to serve as a technical
assistance provider to the grantees. Prior to the conclusion of each of the first two years of the assisted outpatient treatment grant program, the department, in consultation with the grantees, shall review the performance of the
technical assistance provider and determine whether it is appropriate to seek to contract with the same technical assistance provider for the following year.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-1/HB 1013.

37-1-124.
Independent evaluations of the programs; sharing and reporting of information.

Prior to the commencement of funding under the assisted outpatient grant program, the department shall contract with an independent organization, entity, or consultant possessing expertise in the evaluation of community based mental health programs and
policy to evaluate:

The effectiveness of the assisted outpatient grant program in reducing hospitalization and criminal justice interactions among vulnerable individuals with mental health or substance use disorders;

The cost-effectiveness of the assisted outpatient grant program, including its impact on spending within the public mental health system on the treatment of individuals receiving assisted outpatient treatment and spending within the criminal justice system
on the arrest, incarceration, and prosecution of such individuals;

Differences in implementation of the assisted outpatient treatment model among the grantees and the impact of such differences on program outcomes;

The impact of the assisted outpatient grant program on the mental health system at large, including any unintended impacts; and

The perceptions of assisted outpatient treatment and its effectiveness among participating individuals, family members of participating individuals, mental health providers and program staff, and participating probate court judges.

As a condition for participation in the grant program, the department shall require each grantee to agree to share such program information and data with the contracted research organization, entity, or consultant as the department may require, and to
make reasonable accommodations for such organization, entity, or consultant to have access to the grant site and individuals. The department shall further ensure that the contracted research organization, entity, or consultant
is able to perform its functions consistent with all state and federal restrictions on the privacy of personal health information.

In contracting with the research organization, entity, or consultant, the department shall require such organization, entity, or consultant to submit a final report on the effectiveness of the assisted outpatient grant program to the Governor, the chairpersons
of the House Committee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, and the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination no later than December 31, 2025. The department may also require the organization,
entity, or consultant to report interim or provisional findings to the department at earlier dates.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-124

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-1/HB 1013.

37-1-125.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and prescribe such rules and regulations as it deems necessary or appropriate to administer and carry out the grant program provided for in this article.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-125

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-1/HB 1013.